West Virginia, session 2025, HB2088.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 11A. prohibition of sex offenders at school sponsored events. §16-11A-1. Prohibiting those listed on the state sex offender database from public school activities and events. (a) No person having been found guilty of crimes sufficient to be placed on the state sex offender's database shall be permitted to attend any public school function or attend or participate in public school or athletic events in any capacity, regardless of participation by offender's own children.(1) A first violation of this statute shall be a misdemeanor upon first violation, punishable by not more than six months imprisonment; and(2) A second or any other subsequent violation shall constitute a felony punishable by one to five years imprisonment.(b) In the event that a parent teacher conference is required to be conducted with a parent or guardian who is listed on the sex offender database, that conference must be conducted off school property, and shall instead be conducted in the county courthouse, local police department office, or the sheriff's office.